Hawaii statutes.
§171-132 Designation of industrial park.
A contiguous area of not less than five acres of public lands which is
classified or otherwise determined by the board as suitable and economically
feasible for industrial use may be designated as an industrial park:

(1) By resolution adopted by the board of land and
natural resources, and approved by the legislature by concurrent resolution; or

(2) By law. [L 1988, c 361, pt of §1; am L 2002, c
139, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next